Massachusetts, session 194th, S2106.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 46 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the words: “social security number,”;
and further in the fourth paragraph of said section by inserting after the first sentence the
following sentence:- The record of death shall not include the social security number of the
deceased.
of 1